Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Outdoor Advertising.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The safety of persons using the road is of overriding importance when weighed against the interest of a sign owner who has illegally placed a sign where it threatens public safety. January 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may summarily remove a sign or other object it determines to be a visual obstruction or a safety hazard; so long as it protects the sign or other object upon removal, the department is protecting the owner’s only recognizable interest. January 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may not collect the cost of removal of a sign or other object unless the owner has had an opportunity to remove the object and save that cost. The department may use a fee payment schedule instead of figuring the actual removal cost in every case, as long as the schedule is based upon and reflects actual removal costs incurred by the department; and it may charge a reasonable fee for storing the sign. January 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 19.25.075.
Findings and intent of the people of the State of Alaska.

The people of the State of Alaska find that the presence of billboards visible from Alaska’s highways endanger Alaska’s uniqueness and its scenic beauty.

It is the intent of the people of the State of Alaska that Alaska shall forever remain free of billboards.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 5)

Revisor’s notes. —

In codifying this section, the revisor deleted “; and” at the end of subsection (a) and inserted a period.

Sec. 19.25.080.
Purpose.

The purposes of AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

are

to protect the public safety and the welfare of persons using the highways of the state by having outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices along the highways controlled;

to prevent unreasonable distraction of operators of motor vehicles; to prevent confusion with regard to traffic lights, signs, or signals, or other interference with the effectiveness of traffic regulations, and to promote the safety, convenience, and enjoyment of travel on, and protection of the public investment in, highways in this state; to preserve and enhance the natural scenic beauty or aesthetic features of the highways and adjacent areas; and to attract tourists;

to regulate outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices in areas adjacent to the rights-of-way of the interstate, primary, and secondary systems within this state in accordance with this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter;

to provide that outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices that are not in conformity with the requirements of this chapter are a public nuisance;

to provide a statutory basis for regulation of outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices consistent with the public policy declared by the Congress relating to areas within and adjacent to the right-of-way of a highway of the interstate, primary, or secondary systems.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 155 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 158 SLA 1988)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 233, SLA 1968 (HCSCSSB 144 am FCC), see 1968 House Journal, p. 815.

Collateral references. —

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 273 et seq.

Billboards and other outdoor advertising signs as civil nuisance. 38 ALR3d 647.

Validity and construction of provision prohibiting or regulating advertising sign overhanging street or sidewalk. 80 ALR3d 687.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures. 81 ALR3d 486.

Governmental liability for compensation or damages to advertiser arising from obstruction of public view of sign or billboard on account of growth of vegetation in public way. 21 ALR4th 1309.

Sec. 19.25.090.
Outdoor advertising prohibited.

Except as provided in AS

19.25.105

, all outdoor advertising is prohibited.

History.

(§ 3 ch 59 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 155 SLA 1970)

Sec. 19.25.100.
Rural signs.
[Repealed,
§ 14 ch 155 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 19.25.105.
Limitations of outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices.

Outdoor advertising may not be erected or maintained within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main-traveled way of the interstate, primary, or secondary highways in this state except the following:

directional and other official signs and notices which include, but are not limited to, signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders, scenic and historic attractions, which are required or authorized by law, and which shall conform to federal standards for interstate and primary systems;

signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of property upon which they are located or advertising activities conducted on the property;

signs determined by the state, subject to concurrence of the United States Department of Transportation, to be landmark signs, including signs on farm structures or natural surfaces of historic or artistic significance, the preservation of which would be consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

directional signs and notices pertaining to schools;

advertising on bus benches or bus shelters, and adjacent trash receptacles, if the state determines that the advertising conforms to local, state, and federal standards for interstate and primary highways.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Outdoor advertising may not be erected or maintained beyond 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the main traveled way of the interstate, primary, or secondary highways in this state with the purpose of their message being read from that travel way except those outdoor advertising signs, displays, or devices allowed under (a) of this section.

Outdoor advertising may not be erected or maintained within the right-of-way of an interstate, primary, or secondary highway except that outdoor advertising

on bus benches and bus shelters, and adjacent trash receptacles, located within the right-of-way under the authority of a permit issued under AS

19.25.200

is allowed if the bus benches or bus shelters are located within a borough or unified municipality and the buses that stop at that location operate during the entire year; or

present in the right-of-way on January 1, 2005, may remain, subject only to removals required by federal highway funding requirements imposed on the state by federal law, until or unless an encroachment permit for the outdoor advertising is denied under AS

19.25.200(c)

.

[Repealed, § 4 1998 Ballot Measure No. 5.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 155 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 195 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 158 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 84 SLA 1995; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 10 SLA 1997; am § 4 1998 Ballot Measure No. 5; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For tourist-oriented directional signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 1.

For logo signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 2.

For recreational and cultural interest area signs, see 17 AAC 60, art. 3.

For tourist information kiosks, see 17 AAC 60, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Classification and maintenance of advertising structure as nonconforming use. 80 ALR3d 630.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway. 81 ALR3d 564.

Secs. 19.25.110 — 19.25.120.
Removal of nonconforming advertising; neglect or refusal to obey removal order. [Repealed, § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 19.25.123.
[Renumbered as AS 19.05.123.]

Sec. 19.25.130.
Penalty for violation.

A person who violates AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

, or a regulation adopted under AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $5,000.

History.

(§ 7 ch 59 SLA 1949; added by § 1 ch 86 SLA 1953; am § 4 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 5 ch 10 SLA 1997; am § 2 1998 Ballot Measure No. 5)

Sec. 19.25.140.
Compensation for removal of advertising.

The department is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation all advertising devices and any property rights pertaining to them when the advertising devices are required to be removed under AS

19.25.150

.

Damages resulting from a taking in eminent domain shall be ascertained in the manner provided by law.

History.

(§ 5 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 45 ch 69 SLA 1970)

Sec. 19.25.150.
Unlawful advertising.

An advertising sign, display, or device that violates the provisions of AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

is a public nuisance. The department shall give 30 days’ notice, by certified mail, to the owner of the land on which the advertising sign, display, or device is located, ordering its removal if it is prohibited by AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

or ordering the owner to cause it to conform to regulations if it is authorized by AS 19.25.080 — 19.25.180. If the owner of the property fails to comply within 30 days as required in the notice, the department shall remove the outdoor advertising sign, display, or device at the expense of the owner of the land or the person who erected it.

History.

(§ 5 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 19 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

Sec. 19.25.160.
Definitions.

In AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

,

“billboards” means any signboards, signs, displays, notices, or forms of outdoor advertising that do not strictly comply with the provisions of AS

19.25.075

—

19.25.180

, or with any permit or permits issued pursuant to AS

19.25.075

—

19.25.180

;

“interstate system” means that portion of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways located in this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the commissioner, and approved by the secretary of transportation (or by the secretary of commerce before the effective date of the transfer of functions under Public Law 89-670 (80 Stat. 931)), under the provisions of 23 U.S.C.;

“outdoor advertising” includes any outdoor sign, display, or device used to advertise, attract attention, or inform and which is visible to a person on the main-traveled way of a highway of the interstate, primary, or secondary systems in this state, whether by printing, writing, painting, picture, light, drawing, or whether by the use of figures or objects, or a combination of these, or any other thing designed, intended, or used to advertise, inform, or attract attention;

“primary system” or “secondary system” means that portion of connected main highways, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the commissioner, and approved by the secretary of transportation (or by the secretary of commerce before the effective date of the transfer of functions under Public Law 89-670 (80 Stat. 931)), under the provisions of 23 U.S.C.

History.

(§ 5 ch 233 SLA 1968; am §§ 46, 47 ch 69 SLA 1970; am §§ 5, 6 ch 155 SLA 1970; am § 53 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 3 1998 Ballot Measure No. 5)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 19.25.170.
Agreements with the United States; regulations.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements in conformity with the provisions of this title with the United States Secretary of Transportation as provided by 23 U.S.C. relating to the control of outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices in areas adjacent to interstate and primary systems and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of the agreements, and to adopt required regulations.

History.

(§ 5 ch 233 SLA 1968)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

Sec. 19.25.180.
Applicability of municipal enactments.

Notwithstanding AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

, a municipality may enact ordinances that regulate outdoor advertising in a way that is more restrictive than the provisions of AS

19.25.080

—

19.25.180

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 1995)